Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE K. FOREIGN WILLS, OTHER TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENTS, AND FIDUCIARIES

CHAPTER 501. ANCILLARY PROBATE OF FOREIGN WILL

Sec. 501.001. AUTHORITY FOR ANCILLARY PROBATE OF FOREIGN WILL. The written will of a testator who was not domiciled in this state at the time of the testator's death may be admitted to probate at any time in this state if:

(1) the will would affect any property in this state; and

(2) proof is presented that the will stands probated or otherwise established in any state of the United States or a foreign nation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (S.B. 995), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 501.002. APPLICATION FOR ANCILLARY PROBATE OF FOREIGN WILL. (a) An application for ancillary probate in this state of a foreign will admitted to probate or otherwise established in the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death is required to indicate only that probate in this state is requested on the basis of the authenticated copy of the foreign proceedings in which the will was admitted to probate or otherwise established.

(b) An application for ancillary probate in this state of a foreign will that has been admitted to probate or otherwise established in a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death must:

(1) include all information required for an application for probate of a domestic will; and

(2) state the name and address of:

(A) each devisee; and

(B) each person who would be entitled to a portion of the estate as an heir in the absence of a will.

(c) An application described by Subsection (a) or (b) must include for filing a copy of the foreign will and the judgment, order, or decree by which the will was admitted to probate or otherwise established. The copy must:

(1) be attested by and with the original signature of the court clerk or other official who has custody of the will or who is in charge of probate records;

(2) include a certificate with the original signature of the judge or presiding magistrate of the court stating that the attestation is in proper form; and

(3) have the court seal affixed, if a court seal exists.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 501.003. CITATION AND NOTICE. (a) Citation or notice is not required for an application described by Section 501.002(a).

(b) For an application described by Section 501.002(b), a citation shall be issued and served by a qualified delivery method on each devisee and heir identified in the application.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 44, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 501.004. RECORDING BY CLERK. (a) If a foreign will submitted for ancillary probate in this state has been admitted to probate or otherwise established in the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death, it is the ministerial duty of the court clerk to record the will and the evidence of the will's probate or other establishment in the judge's probate docket.

(b) If a foreign will submitted for ancillary probate in this state has been admitted to probate or otherwise established in a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death, and a contest against the ancillary probate is not filed as authorized by Chapter 504, the court clerk shall record the will and the evidence of the will's probate or other establishment in the judge's probate docket.

(c) A court order is not necessary for the recording of a foreign will in accordance with this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 8.019, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 501.005. EFFECT OF FILING AND RECORDING FOREIGN WILL. On filing and recording a foreign will in accordance with this chapter, the foreign will:

(1) is considered to be admitted to probate; and

(2) has the same effect for all purposes as if the original will had been admitted to probate by order of a court of this state, subject to contest in the manner and to the extent provided by Chapter 504.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 501.006. ANCILLARY LETTERS TESTAMENTARY. (a) On application, an executor named in a foreign will admitted to ancillary probate in this state in accordance with this chapter is entitled to receive ancillary letters testamentary on proof made to the court that:

(1) the executor has qualified to serve as executor in the jurisdiction in which the will was previously admitted to probate or otherwise established;

(2) the executor is not disqualified from serving in that capacity in this state; and

(3) if the will is admitted to ancillary probate in this state after the fourth anniversary of the testator's death, the executor continues to serve in that capacity in the jurisdiction in which the will was previously admitted to probate or otherwise established.

(b) After the proof required by Subsection (a) is made, the court shall enter an order directing that ancillary letters testamentary be issued to the executor. The court shall revoke any letters of administration previously issued by the court to any other person on application of the executor after personal service of citation on the person to whom the letters were issued.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (S.B. 995), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 501.007. EFFECT ON PROPERTY. A foreign will admitted to ancillary probate in this state as provided by this chapter after having been admitted to probate or otherwise established in the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death is effective to dispose of property in this state regardless of whether the will was executed with the formalities required by this title.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 501.008. SETTING ASIDE OF CERTAIN FOREIGN WILLS. (a) This section applies only to a foreign will admitted to ancillary probate in this state, in accordance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter, based on the previous probate or other establishment of the will in the jurisdiction in which the testator was domiciled at the time of the testator's death.

(b) The admission to probate in this state of a foreign will to which this section applies shall be set aside if it is subsequently proven in a proceeding brought for that purpose that the foreign jurisdiction in which the will was admitted to probate or otherwise established was not in fact the domicile of the testator at the time of the testator's death.

(c) The title or rights of a person who, before commencement of a proceeding to set aside the admission to probate of a foreign will under this section, purchases property in good faith and for value from the personal representative or a devisee or otherwise deals in good faith with the personal representative or a devisee are not affected by the subsequent setting aside of the admission to probate in this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.